Missouri, session 2026, SB1198.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 170.016, to read as
follows:
170.016. 1. Human growth and development curriculum
shall be taught in the public schools of this state. Human
growth and development education shall include, but shall
not be limited to:
(1) Human biology related to pregnancy;
(2) Human development inside of a womb;
(3) A high-definition ultrasound video, at least three
minutes in duration, showing the development of the brain,
heart, sex organs, and other vital organs in early fetal
development; and
(4) A high-quality, computer-generated rendering or
animation showing the process of fertilization and every
stage of fetal development, highlighting significant markers
in cell growth and organ development until birth.
2. School districts shall provide the curriculum
described in subsection 1 of this section to students in
grades one through six in an age-appropriate manner.

SB 1198 2
Schools may incorporate the curriculum into an existing
course or courses or develop curriculum for a separate
course.
3. School districts shall provide a continuation of
the curriculum described in subsection 1 of this section to
students in grades seven and eight in a developmentally
appropriate manner. Schools may incorporate the curriculum
into an existing course or courses or develop curriculum for
a separate course.
4. In order to graduate from a public high school
accredited by the state board of education with a standard
diploma, students in grades nine through twelve shall
receive human growth and development instruction as
described in subsection 1 of this section. Such instruction
shall be integrated into health or science education and
shall be incorporated into the academic performance
standards adopted by the state board of education under
section 160.514.
5. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall develop guidelines, material, professional
development programs, and resources designed to enable
schools and teachers to include human growth and development
instruction within any course of study currently offered by
the school district or offer human growth and development as
a separate course.
Section B. Because of the urgent need to provide
students accurate instruction on the fundamentals of human
growth and development, section A of this act is deemed
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared
to be an emergency act within the meaning of the

SB 1198 3
constitution, and section A of this act shall be in full
force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✓